Utah statutes.
53A-3-426.   Education employee associations -- Equal participation -- Prohibition on endorsement or preferential treatment -- Naming of school breaks.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Education employee association" includes teacher associations, teacher unions, teacher organizations, and classified education employees' associations.

(b)  "School" means a school district, a school in a school district, a charter school, or the State Board of Education and its employees.

(2)  A school shall allow education employee associations equal access to the following activities:

(a)  distribution of information in or access to teachers' or employees' physical or electronic mailboxes, including email accounts that are provided by the school; and

(b)  membership solicitation activities at new teacher or employee orientation training or functions.

(3)  If a school permits an education employee association to engage in any of the activities described in Subsection (2), the school shall permit all other education employee associations to engage in the activity on the same terms and conditions afforded to the education employee association.

(4)  It is unlawful for a school to:

(a)  establish or maintain structures, procedures, or policies that favor one education employee association over another or otherwise give preferential treatment to an education employee association; or

(b)  explicitly or implicitly endorse any education employee association.

(5)  A school's calendars and publications may not include or refer to the name of any education employee association in relation to any day or break in the school calendar.



Enacted by Chapter 88, 2007 General Session

